tex/context/patterns/mkii/lang-bg.pat
\patterns{
.антиа4
.антиб4
.антив4
.антиг4
.антид4
.антие4
.антиж4
.антиз4
.антии4
.антий4
.антик4
.антил4
.антим4
.антин4
.антио4
.антип4
.антир4
.антис4
.антит4
.антиу4
.антиф4
.антих4
.антиц4
.антиш4
.антищ4
.антиъ4
.антию4
.антия4
.бб8
.бв8
.бг8
.бд8
.бж8
.бз8
.бк8
.бл8
.бм8
.бн8
.бп8
.бр8
.бс8
.бт8
.бф8
.бх8
.бц8
.бч8
.бш8
.бщ8
.вб8
.вбб8
.вбв8
.вбг8
.вбд8
.вбж8
.вбз8
.вбк8
.вбл8
.вбм8
.вбн8
.вбп8
.вбр8
.вбс8
.вбт8
.вбф8
.вбх8
.вбц8
.вбч8
.вбш8
.вбщ8
.вв8
.ввб8
.ввв8
.ввг8
.ввд8
.ввж8
.ввз8
.ввк8
.ввл8
.ввм8
.ввн8
.ввп8
.ввр8
.ввс8
.ввт8
.ввф8
.ввх8
.ввц8
.ввч8
.ввш8
.ввщ8
.вг8
.вгб8
.вгв8
.вгг8
.вгд8
.вгж8
.вгз8
.вгк8
.вгл8
.вгм8
.вгн8
.вгп8
.вгр8
.вгс8
.вгт8
.вгф8
.вгх8
.вгц8
.вгч8
.вгш8
.вгщ8
.вд8
.вдб8
.вдв8
.вдг8
.вдд8
.вдж8
.вдз8
.вдк8
.вдл8
.вдм8
.вдн8
.вдп8
.вдр8
.вдс8
.вдт8
.вдф8
.вдх8
.вдц8
.вдч8
.вдш8
.вдщ8
.вж8
.вжб8
.вжв8
.вжг8
.вжд8
.вжж8
.вжз8
.вжк8
.вжл8
.вжм8
.вжн8
.вжп8
.вжр8
.вжс8
.вжт8
.вжф8
.вжх8
.вжц8
.вжч8
.вжш8
.вжщ8
.вз8
.взб8
.взв8
.взг8
.взд8
.взж8
.взз8
.взк8
.взл8
.взм8
.взн8
.взп8
.взр8
.взс8
.взт8
.взф8
.взх8
.взц8
.взч8
.взш8
.взщ8
.вк8
.вкб8
.вкв8
.вкг8
.вкд8
.вкж8
.вкз8
.вкк8
.вкл8
.вкм8
.вкн8
.вкп8
.вкр8
.вкс8
.вкт8
.вкф8
.вкх8
.вкц8
.вкч8
.вкш8
.вкщ8
.вл8
.влб8
.влв8
.влг8
.влд8
.влж8
.влз8
.влк8
.влл8
.влм8
.влн8
.влп8
.влр8
.влс8
.влт8
.влф8
.влх8
.влц8
.влч8
.влш8
.влщ8
.вм8
.вмб8
.вмв8
.вмг8
.вмд8
.вмж8
.вмз8
.вмк8
.вмл8
.вмм8
.вмн8
.вмп8
.вмр8
.вмс8
.вмт8
.вмф8
.вмх8
.вмц8
.вмч8
.вмш8
.вмщ8
.вн8
.внб8
.внв8
.внг8
.внд8
.внж8
.внз8
.внк8
.внл8
.внм8
.внн8
.внп8
.внр8
.внс8
.внт8
.внф8
.внх8
.внц8
.внч8
.внш8
.внщ8
.вп8
.впб8
.впв8
.впг8
.впд8
.впж8
.впз8
.впк8
.впл8
.впм8
.впн8
.впп8
.впр8
.впс8
.впт8
.впф8
.впх8
.впц8
.впч8
.впш8
.впщ8
.вр8
.врб8
.врв8
.врг8
.врд8
.врж8
.врз8
.врк8
.врл8
.врм8
.врн8
.врп8
.врр8
.врс8
.врт8
.врф8
.врх8
.врц8
.врч8
.врш8
.врщ8
.вс8
.всб8
.всв8
.всг8
.всд8
.всж8
.всз8
.вск8
.всл8
.всм8
.всн8
.всп8
.вср8
.всс8
.вст8
.всф8
.всх8
.всц8
.всч8
.всш8
.всщ8
.вт8
.втб8
.втв8
.втг8
.втд8
.втж8
.втз8
.втк8
.втл8
.втм8
.втн8
.втп8
.втр8
.втс8
.втт8
.втф8
.втх8
.втц8
.втч8
.втш8
.втщ8
.вф8
.вфб8
.вфв8
.вфг8
.вфд8
.вфж8
.вфз8
.вфк8
.вфл8
.вфм8
.вфн8
.вфп8
.вфр8
.вфс8
.вфт8
.вфф8
.вфх8
.вфц8
.вфч8
.вфш8
.вфщ8
.вх8
.вхб8
.вхв8
.вхг8
.вхд8
.вхж8
.вхз8
.вхк8
.вхл8
.вхм8
.вхн8
.вхп8
.вхр8
.вхс8
.вхт8
.вхф8
.вхх8
.вхц8
.вхч8
.вхш8
.вхщ8
.вц8
.вцб8
.вцв8
.вцг8
.вцд8
.вцж8
.вцз8
.вцк8
.вцл8
.вцм8
.вцн8
.вцп8
.вцр8
.вцс8
.вцт8
.вцф8
.вцх8
.вцц8
.вцч8
.вцш8
.вцщ8
.вч8
.вчб8
.вчв8
.вчг8
.вчд8
.вчж8
.вчз8
.вчк8
.вчл8
.вчм8
.вчн8
.вчп8
.вчр8
.вчс8
.вчт8
.вчф8
.вчх8
.вчц8
.вчч8
.вчш8
.вчщ8
.вш8
.вшб8
.вшв8
.вшг8
.вшд8
.вшж8
.вшз8
.вшк8
.вшл8
.вшм8
.вшн8
.вшп8
.вшр8
.вшс8
.вшт8
.вшф8
.вшх8
.вшц8
.вшч8
.вшш8
.вшщ8
.вщ8
.вщб8
.вщв8
.вщг8
.вщд8
.вщж8
.вщз8
.вщк8
.вщл8
.вщм8
.вщн8
.вщп8
.вщр8
.вщс8
.вщт8
.вщф8
.вщх8
.вщц8
.вщч8
.вщш8
.вщщ8
.въ2за4
.въ2зб4
.въ2зв4
.въ2зг4
.въ2зд4
.въ2зе4
.въ5з4ел
.въ5з4е5ла
.въ5з4е5лът
.въ2зж4
.въ2зз4
.въ2зи4
.въ2зй4
.въ2зк4
.въ2зл4
.въ2зм4
.въ2зн4
.въ2зо4
.въ2зп4
.въ2зр4
.въ2зс4
.въ2зт4
.въ2зу4
.въ2зф4
.въ2зх4
.въ2зц4
.въ2зч4
.въ2зш4
.въ2зщ4
.въ2зъ4
.въ2зю4
.въ2зя4
.гб8
.гв8
.гг8
.гд8
.гж8
.гз8
.гк8
.гл8
.гм8
.гн8
.гп8
.гр8
.гс8
.гт8
.гф8
.гх8
.гц8
.гч8
.гш8
.гщ8
.дб8
.дв8
.дг8
.дд8
.дж8
.дз8
.дк8
.дл8
.дм8
.дн8
.доа4
.доб4
.до4б5лест
.до4б5р
.до4б6ро
.дов4
.дог4
.до4г5м
.дод4
.дое4
.дож4
.доз4
.дои4
.док4
.до4к5л
.до4к5т
.дол4
.до4л5н
.до4л5ч
.дом4
.дон4
.до4н5г
.до4н5д
.до4н5ж
.до4н5к
.до4н5с
.до4н5ч
.доо4
.доп4
.дор4
.дос4
.до4с5то
.дот4
.доу4
.доф4
.дох4
.доц4
.доч4
.дош4
.дощ4
.доъ4
.дою4
.доя4
.дп8
.др8
.дс8
.дт8
.дф8
.дх8
.дц8
.дч8
.дш8
.дщ8
.жб8
.жв8
.жг8
.жд8
.жж8
.жз8
.жк8
.жл8
.жм8
.жн8
.жп8
.жр8
.жс8
.жт8
.жф8
.жх8
.жц8
.жч8
.жш8
.жщ8
.заа4
.заб4
.зав4
.заг4
.зад4
.за4д5гран
.за4д5гроб
.за4д5кулис
.за4д5мин
.за4д5мор
.за4д5н
.зае4
.заж4
.заз4
.заи4
.зак4
.зал4
.за4л5п
.зам4
.зан4
.за4н5д
.зао4
.зап4
.за4п5т
.зар4
.за4р5з
.зас4
.зат4
.зау4
.заф4
.зах4
.зац4
.зач4
.заш4
.защ4
.заъ4
.заю4
.зая4
.зб8
.зв8
.зг8
.зд8
.зж8
.зз8
.зк8
.зл8
.зм8
.зн8
.зп8
.зр8
.зс8
.зт8
.зф8
.зх8
.зц8
.зч8
.зш8
.зщ8
.иза4
.изб4
.изв4
.изг4
.изд4
.изе4
.изж4
.изз4
.изи4
.изй4
.изк4
.изл4
.изм4
.изн4
.изо2бб4
.изо2бв4
.изо2бг4
.изо2бд4
.изо2бж4
.изо2бз4
.изо4би
.изо2бк4
.изо2бл4
.изо2бм4
.изо2бн4
.изо2бп4
.изо2бр4
.изо2бс4
.изо2бт4
.изо2бф4
.изо2бх4
.изо2бц4
.изо2бч4
.изо2бш4
.изо2бщ4
.изохк
.изп4
.изпоа4
.изпоб4
.изпов4
.изпог4
.изпод4
.изпое4
.изпож4
.изпоз4
.изпои4
.изпой4
.изпок4
.изпол4
.изпо4л5з
.изпом4
.изпо4м5п
.изпон4
.изпоо4
.изпоп4
.изпор4
.изпо4р5т
.изпос4
.изпот4
.изпоу4
.изпоф4
.изпох4
.изпоц4
.изпоч4
.изпош4
.изпощ4
.изпоъ4
.изпою4
.изпоя4
.изр4
.изс4
.изт4
.изу4
.изф4
.изх4
.изц4
.изч4
.изш4
.изщ4
.изъ4
.изю4
.изя4
.кб8
.кв8
.кг8
.кд8
.кж8
.кз8
.кк8
.кл8
.км8
.кн8
.кп8
.кр8
.кс8
.кт8
.кф8
.кх8
.кц8
.кч8
.кш8
.кщ8
.лб8
.лв8
.лг8
.лд8
.лж8
.лз8
.лк8
.лл8
.лм8
.лн8
.лп8
.лр8
.лс8
.лт8
.лф8
.лх8
.лц8
.лч8
.лш8
.лщ8
.мб8
.мв8
.мг8
.мд8
.мж8
.мз8
.мк8
.мл8
.мм8
.мн8
.мп8
.мр8
.мс8
.мт8
.мф8
.мх8
.мц8
.мч8
.мш8
.мщ8
.наа4
.наб4
.нав4
.наг4
.на4г5ло
.на2дб4
.на2дв4
.на2дг4
.на2дд4
.на2д3ж4
.на3д4жав
.на3д4жас
.на2дз4
.на4ди4гр
.на2дк4
.на2дл4
.на2дм4
.на2дн4
.на2дп4
.на2др4
.над4ращ
.над4реб
.над4рем
.над4роб
.над4рус
.над4рън
.над4рям
.на2дс4
.на2дт4
.на2дф4
.на2дх4
.на2дц4
.на2дч4
.на2дш4
.на2дщ4
.нае4
.наж4
.наз4
.наи4
.нак4
.нал4
.нам4
.нан4
.нао4
.нап4
.нар4
.на4р5г
.на4р5к
.нас4
.нат4
.нау4
.наф4
.нах4
.нац4
.нач4
.наш4
.нащ4
.наъ4
.наю4
.ная4
.нб8
.нв8
.нг8
.нд8
.нж8
.нз8
.нк8
.нл8
.нм8
.нн8
.нп8
.нр8
.нс8
.нт8
.нф8
.нх8
.нц8
.нч8
.нш8
.нщ8
.оа4
.оа5зис
.оба4гн
.обб4
.обв4
.обг4
.обд4
.обж4
.обз4
.оби4гр
.обк4
.обл4
.об4лаго
.об4лаж
.обм4
.обн4
.обо4бщ
.обоз4н
.обоз4р
.обос4н
.обособ
.обп4
.обр4
.об4рем
.об4рул
.об4ръс
.обс4
.обт4
.обу4зд
.обусл
.обф4
.обх4
.обц4
.обч4
.обш4
.общ4
.об4щ5н
.обя4сн
.ов4
.ов4дов
.ов4лад
.ов5ц
.ов5ч
.ог4
.ог5н
.од4
.ое4
.ож4
.оз4
.озд4р
.ои4
.ой4
.ок4
.ок5си
.ок5т
.ол4
.ол5тар
.ом4
.ом5лет
.ом5ни
.он4
.он5баш
.он5дул
.он5зи
.он5ко
.он5лайн
.он5то
.оо4
.оп4
.оп5т
.оп5ци
.ор4
.ор5б
.ор5г
.ор5д
.ор5к
.ор5л
.ор5н
.ор5т
.ор5ф
.ор5х
.ос4
.ос5ман
.ос5мин
.ос5миц
.ос5мич
.ос5мо
.ос5те
.ос5тро
.ос5ци
.отб4
.отв4
.отг4
.отд4
.отж4
.отз4
.оти4в
.оти4д
.отк4
.отл4
.отм4
.отн4
.отп4
.отр4
.отс4
.отт4
.оту4ч
.отф4
.отх4
.отц4
.отч4
.отш4
.отщ4
.оу4
.оф4
.ох4
.ох5ва
.ох5ка
.ох5на
.оц4
.оч4
.ош4
.ощ4
.оъ4
.ою4
.оя4
.пб8
.пв8
.пг8
.пд8
.пж8
.пз8
.пк8
.пл8
.пм8
.пн8
.поа4
.поб4
.пов4
.пог4
.по2дб4
.по2дв4
.под4воу
.по2дг4
.по2дд4
.по2д3ж4
.по3д4жав
.по3д4жур
.по2дз4
.по2ди4гр
.по2ди4зр
.по2дк4
.по2дл4
.по2дм4
.по2дн4
.по2до4паш
.по2до4стр
.по2до4тд
.по2до4тч
.по2до4ф
.по2дп4
.по2др4
.под4рем
.под4рън
.под4ръп
.под4рям
.по2дс4
.по2дт4
.по2ду4пр
.по2ду4ч
.по2дф4
.по2дх4
.по2дц4
.по2дч4
.по2дш4
.по2дщ4
.пое4
.пож4
.поз4
.позаа4
.позаб4
.позав4
.позаг4
.позад4
.позае4
.позаж4
.позаз4
.позаи4
.позай4
.позак4
.позал4
.позам4
.позан4
.позао4
.позап4
.позар4
.позас4
.позат4
.позау4
.позаф4
.позах4
.позац4
.позач4
.позаш4
.позащ4
.позаъ4
.позаю4
.позая4
.пои4
.пои2за4
.пои2зб4
.пои2зв4
.пои2зг4
.пои2зд4
.пои2зе4
.пои2зж4
.пои2зз4
.пои2зи4
.пои2зй4
.пои2зк4
.пои2зл4
.пои2зм4
.пои2зн4
.пои2зо4
.пои2зп4
.пои2зр4
.пои2зс4
.пои2зт4
.пои2зу4
.пои2зф4
.пои2зх4
.пои2зц4
.пои2зч4
.пои2зш4
.пои2зщ4
.пои2зъ4
.пои2зю4
.пои2зя4
.пой4
.пок4
.пол4
.по4л5з
.по4л5к
.по4л5с
.пом4
.по4м5п
.пон4
.понаа4
.понаб4
.понав4
.понаг4
.пона2дб4
.пона2дв4
.пона2дг4
.пона2дд4
.пона2дж4
.пона2дз4
.пона2ди4гр
.пона2дк4
.пона2дл4
.пона2дм4
.пона2дн4
.пона2дп4
.пона2др4
.понад4ращ
.понад4реб
.понад4рем
.понад4роб
.понад4рус
.понад4рън
.понад4рям
.пона2дс4
.пона2дт4
.пона2дф4
.пона2дх4
.пона2дц4
.пона2дч4
.пона2дш4
.пона2дщ4
.понае4
.понаж4
.поназ4
.понаи4
.понай4
.понак4
.понал4
.понам4
.понан4
.понао4
.понап4
.понар4
.понас4
.понат4
.понау4
.понаф4
.понах4
.понац4
.понач4
.понаш4
.понащ4
.понаъ4
.понаю4
.поная4
.по4н5т
.пооа4
.поо4бад
.поо4бажд
.поо2бб4
.поо2бв4
.поо2бг4
.поо2бд4
.поо2бж4
.поо2бз4
.поо2би4гр
.поо4бик
.поо2бк4
.поо2бл4
.поо2бм4
.поо2бн4
.поо2бп4
.поо2бр4
.поо2бс4
.поо2бт4
.поо2бф4
.поо2бх4
.поо2бц4
.поо2бч4
.поо2бш4
.поо2бщ4
.поо2бя4сн
.поов4
.поог4
.поод4
.поое4
.поож4
.пооз4
.поои4
.поой4
.поок4
.поол4
.поом4
.поон4
.пооо4
.пооп4
.поор4
.поос4
.поо2тб4
.поо2тв4
.поо2тг4
.поо2тд4
.поо2тж4
.поо2тз4
.поо2тк4
.поо2тл4
.поо2тм4
.поо2тн4
.поо2тп4
.поо2тр4
.поо2тс4
.поо2тт4
.поо2ту4ч
.поо2тф4
.поо2тх4
.поо2тц4
.поо2тч4
.поо2тш4
.поо2тщ4
.пооу4
.пооф4
.поох4
.пооц4
.пооч4
.поош4
.поощ4
.поо4щ5р
.пооъ4
.поою4
.пооя4
.поп4риа4
.поп4риб4
.поп4рив4
.поп4риг4
.поп4рид4
.поп4рие4
.поп4риж4
.поп4риз4
.поп4рии4
.поп4рий4
.поп4рик4
.поп4рил4
.поп4рим4
.поп4рин4
.поп4рио4
.поп4рип4
.поп4рир4
.поп4рис4
.поп4рит4
.поп4риу4
.поп4риф4
.поп4рих4
.поп4риц4
.поп4рич4
.поп4риш4
.поп4рищ4
.поп4риъ4
.поп4рию4
.поп4рия4
.пор4
.по4р5н
.по4р5т
.по4р5ф
.по4р5ц
.пос4
.по4с4т
.пот4
.по4т5н
.поу4
.поф4
.пох4
.поц4
.пош4
.пощ4
.поъ4
.пою4
.поя4
.пп8
.пр8
.преа4
.преб4
.прев4
.превъ2за4
.превъ2зб4
.превъ2зв4
.превъ2зг4
.превъ2зд4
.превъ2зе4
.превъ2зж4
.превъ2зз4
.превъ2зи4
.превъ2зй4
.превъ2зк4
.превъ2зл4
.превъ2зм4
.превъ2зн4
.превъ2зо4
.превъ2зп4
.превъ2зр4
.превъ2зс4
.превъ2зт4
.превъ2зу4
.превъ2зф4
.превъ2зх4
.превъ2зц4
.превъ2зч4
.превъ2зш4
.превъ2зщ4
.превъ2зъ4
.превъ2зю4
.превъ2зя4
.прег4
.пре2дб4
.пре2дв4
.пре2дг4
.пре2дд4
.пре2дж4
.пре2дз4
.пре2ди4зб4
.пре2ди4зв4
.пре2ди4нфар
.пре2ди4стор
.пре2дк4
.пре2дл4
.пре2дм4
.пре2дн4
.пре2до4бед
.пре2до4ктом
.пре2доп4ред
.пре2дос4воб
.пре2до2та4
.пре2до2тб4
.пре2до2тв4
.пре2до2тг4
.пре2до2тд4
.пре2до2те4
.пре2до2тж4
.пре2до2тз4
.пре2до2ти4
.пре2до2тй4
.пре2до2тк4
.пре2до2тл4
.пре2до2тм4
.пре2до2тн4
.пре2до2то4
.пре2до2тп4
.пре2до2тр4
.пре2до2тс4
.пре2до2тт4
.пре2до2ту4
.пре2до2тф4
.пре2до2тх4
.пре2до2тц4
.пре2до2тч4
.пре2до2тш4
.пре2до2тщ4
.пре2до2тъ4
.пре2до2тю4
.пре2до2тя4
.пре2дох4р
.пре2дп4
.пре2др4
.пред4рем
.пре2д4реш
.пред4рям
.пре2дс4
.пре2дт4
.пре2ду4бед
.пре2ду4бежд
.пре2дугад
.пре2думис
.пре2думиш
.пре2ду4пр
.пре2дусе
.пре2дус4л
.пре2ду4трин
.пре2ду4чил
.пре2дф4
.пре2дх4
.пре2дц4
.пре2дч4
.пре2дш4
.пре2дщ4
.пре2дя4в
.пре2дя4ст
.прее4
.преж4
.пре4ж5д
.презаа4
.презаб4
.презав4
.презаг4
.презад4
.презае4
.презаж4
.презаз4
.презаи4
.презай4
.презак4
.презал4
.презам4
.презан4
.презао4
.презап4
.презар4
.презас4
.презат4
.презау4
.презаф4
.презах4
.презац4
.презач4
.презаш4
.презащ4
.презаъ4
.презаю4
.презая4
.пре2зб4
.пре2зв4
.пре2зг4
.пре2зд4
.пре2зж4
.пре2зз4
.пре2зк4
.пре2зл4
.пре2зм4
.пре2зн4
.пре4з5о4кеан
.пре2зп4
.през4р
.пре4з5рам
.пре4з5ред
.пре2зс4
.пре2зт4
.пре2зф4
.пре2зх4
.пре2зц4
.пре2зч4
.пре2зш4
.пре2зщ4
.преи4
.преи2за4
.преи2зб4
.преи2зв4
.преи2зг4
.преи2зд4
.преи2зе4
.преи2зж4
.преи2зз4
.преи2зи4
.преи2зй4
.преи2зк4
.преи2зл4
.преи2зм4
.преи2зн4
.преи2зо4
.преи2зп4
.преи2зр4
.преи2зс4
.преи2зт4
.преи2зу4
.преи2зф4
.преи2зх4
.преи2зц4
.преи2зч4
.преи2зш4
.преи2зщ4
.преи2зъ4
.преи2зю4
.преи2зя4
.прей4
.прек4
.прел4
.прем4
.прен4
.пренаа4
.пренаб4
.пренав4
.пренаг4
.пренад4
.пренае4
.пренаж4
.преназ4
.пренаи4
.пренай4
.пренак4
.пренал4
.пренам4
.пренан4
.пренао4
.пренап4
.пренар4
.пренас4
.пренат4
.пренау4
.пренаф4
.пренах4
.пренац4
.пренач4
.пренаш4
.пренащ4
.пренаъ4
.пренаю4
.преная4
.прео4
.преп4
.прер4
.прес4
.пре4с5но
.пре4с5па
.пре4с4пи
.пре4с5ц
.прет4
.преу4
.преф4
.прех4
.прец4
.преч4
.пре4ч5к
.прещ4
.преъ4
.прею4
.прея4
.приа4
.приб4
.прив4
.приг4
.прид4
.прие4
.приж4
.приз4
.при4з5м
.прии4
.прий4
.прик4
.прил4
.прим4
.при4м5к
.прин4
.при4н5т
.при4н5ц
.прио4
.прип4
.при4п5в
.при4п5к
.при4п5н
.прир4
.прис4
.прит4
.при4т5ч
.приу4
.приф4
.прих4
.при4х5н
.приц4
.прич4
.приш4
.при4ш5к
.прищ4
.приъ4
.прию4
.прия4
.проа4
.проб4
.про4б5в
.про4б5к
.про4б5лем
.пров4
.прог4
.прод4
.прое4
.прож4
.проз4
.прои4
.прок4
.про4к5с
.прол4
.пром4
.прон4
.проо4
.проп4
.прор4
.прос4
.про4с5б
.про4с4т
.про4с5ф
.прот4
.проу4
.прох4
.проц4
.проч4
.прош4
.прощ4
.проъ4
.прою4
.проя4
.пс8
.пт8
.пф8
.пх8
.пц8
.пч8
.пш8
.пщ8
.ра2за4
.ра2зб4
.ра2зв4
.ра2зг4
.ра2зд4
.ра2зе4
.ра2зж4
.ра2зз4
.ра2зи4
.ра2зй4
.ра2зк4
.ра2зл4
.ра2зм4
.ра2зн4
.ра2зо4
.ра2зп4
.ра2зр4
.ра2зс4
.ра2зт4
.ра2зу4
.ра2зф4
